Utah statutes.
17B-2a-502.   Provisions applicable to irrigation districts.

(1)  Each irrigation district is governed by and has the powers stated in:

(a)  this part; and

(b)  Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.

(2)  This part applies only to irrigation districts.

(3)  An irrigation district is not subject to the provisions of any other part of this chapter.

(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision in this part governs.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

